Utah statutes.
58-28-604.   Veterinarian-client-patient relationship.

(1)  A licensee under this chapter may only practice under a veterinarian-client-patient relationship as defined in Section 58-28-102.

(2)  A veterinarian-client-patient relationship may not be established solely by telephone or other electronic means.

